Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 4 CLASSES OF LICENSES AND PERMITS
44-3-417. Brew pub license - definitions.

A brew pub license may be issued to any person operating a brew pub and also selling alcohol beverages for consumption on the premises.

A brew pub licensed pursuant to this section to manufacture malt liquors upon its licensed premises may, upon approval of the state licensing authority, manufacture malt liquors upon alternating proprietor licensed premises within the restrictions specified in section 44-3-103 (5).

Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, during the hours established in section 44-3-901 (6)(b), malt liquors manufactured by a brew pub licensee on the licensed premises or alternating proprietor licensed premises may be:

Furnished for consumption on the premises;

Sold to independent wholesalers for distribution to licensed retailers;

Sold to the public in sealed containers for off-premises consumption. Except as provided in subsection (2)(a.5) of this section, only malt liquors manufactured and packaged by the licensee on the licensed premises or on an alternating proprietor licensed premises may be sold to the public in sealed containers.

Sold at wholesale to licensed retailers in an amount up to three hundred thousand gallons per calendar year.

For purposes of sales to the public in sealed containers pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(III) of this section, a brew pub licensee may also sell on the licensed premises malt liquors that are manufactured by the licensee on another brew pub licensed premises that is under the same ownership as the brew pub licensed premises at which the sale occurs.

As used in this subsection (2)(a.5), "same ownership" means that a person or group of persons has at least fifty percent ownership interest in the licensed brew pub at which the sale to the public of malt liquors in sealed containers occurs and in another brew pub licensed premises at which the malt liquors being sold were manufactured.

A brew pub authorized to manufacture malt liquors upon alternating proprietor licensed premises shall not conduct retail sales of malt liquors from an area licensed or defined as an alternating proprietor licensed premises.

Every person selling alcohol beverages pursuant to this section shall purchase alcohol beverages, other than those that are manufactured at the licensed brew pub, from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3; except that, during a calendar year, a person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

The brew pub licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the alcohol beverages purchased, and the price paid for the alcohol beverages. The licensee shall retain the receipt and make it available to state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

A brew pub licensee shall sell alcohol beverages for on-premises consumption only if at least fifteen percent of the gross on-premises food and drink income of the business of the licensed premises is from the sale of food. For purposes of this subsection (4), "food" means a quantity of foodstuffs of such nature as is ordinarily consumed by an individual at regular intervals for the purpose of sustenance.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a brew pub license to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

Notwithstanding subsection (5)(a) of this section, a person interested directly or indirectly in a brew pub license may conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in a license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c) or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1020, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(b), IP(2)(a), (2)(a)(III), (2)(b), and (3) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 11, § 16, effective January 31.

L. 2020:

(2)(a)(III) amended and (2)(a.5) added, (SB 20-194), ch. 263, p. 1264, § 1, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-415 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-418. Club license - legislative declaration.

A club license shall be issued to persons selling alcohol beverages by the drink only to members of the club and guests and only for consumption on the premises of the club.

Every person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section shall purchase the alcohol beverages only from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3; except that, during a calendar year, a person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

The club licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the alcohol beverages purchased, and the price paid for the alcohol beverages. The licensee shall retain the receipt and make it available to the state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that the people of the state of Colorado desire to promote and achieve tax equity and fairness among all the state's citizens and further desire to conform to the public policy of nondiscrimination. The general assembly further declares that the provisions of this subsection (3) are enacted for these reasons and for no other purpose.

Any club licensee that has a policy to restrict membership on the basis of sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, race, creed, religion, color, ancestry, or national origin shall, when issuing a receipt for expenses that may otherwise be used by taxpayers for deduction purposes pursuant to section 162 (a) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, for purposes of determining taxes owed pursuant to article 22 of title 39, incorporate a printed statement on the receipt as follows:

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a club license to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44; except that:

Such a person may have an interest in an arts license or an airline public transportation system license granted under this article 3, or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4);

Any person who owns, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, any other license issued pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 may be listed as an officer or director on a club license if the person does not individually manage or receive any direct financial benefit from the operation of the license.

The expenditures covered by this receipt are
nondeductible for state income tax purposes.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1021, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 11, § 17, effective January 31.

L. 2021:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 899, § 49, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-416 as it existed prior to 2018.

Cross references:

(1) For section 162 (a) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", see 26 U.S.C. § 162 (a).

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1108, see section 1 of chapter 156, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

44-3-419. Arts license - definition.

An arts license may be issued to any nonprofit arts organization that sponsors and presents productions or performances of an artistic or cultural nature, and the arts license permits the licensee to sell alcohol beverages only to patrons of the productions or performances for consumption on the licensed premises in connection with the productions or performances. No person licensed pursuant to this section shall permit any exterior or interior advertising concerning the sale of alcohol beverages on the licensed premises.

An arts license may be issued to any municipality owning arts facilities at which productions or performances of an artistic or cultural nature are presented, in the same manner as provided for in subsection (1)(a) of this section and subject to the same restrictions.

Any provision of this article 3 to the contrary notwithstanding, the proximity of premises licensed pursuant to this section to any public or parochial school or the principal campus of a college, university, or seminary shall not, in and of itself, affect the granting or denial of such license by the state and the local licensing authority, but a public or parochial school shall not contain a licensed premises. The campus of a college, university, or seminary may contain a licensed premises.

As used in this section, "nonprofit arts organization" means only an organization subject to the provisions of articles 121 to 137 of title 7 and held to be tax-exempt by the federal internal revenue service.

Every person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section shall purchase the alcohol beverages only from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3; except that, during a calendar year, a person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

An arts licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the alcohol beverages purchased, and the price paid for the alcohol beverages. The licensee shall retain the receipt and make it available to the state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1022, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 12, § 18, effective January 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-417 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-420. Racetrack license.

A racetrack licensee may sell alcohol beverages by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises only to customers of the racetrack and shall serve food as well as alcohol beverages.

Every person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section shall purchase the alcohol beverages only from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3; except that, during a calendar year, a person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

A racetrack licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the alcohol beverages purchased, and the price paid for the alcohol beverages. The licensee shall retain the receipt and make it available to the state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

If any person holds a valid license pursuant to this article 3 to sell alcohol beverages by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises, the person is not required to obtain a racetrack class license pursuant to this section if simulcast races with pari-mutuel wagering occur on the licensed premises.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a racetrack license to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44; except that a person licensed under this section may have an interest in a license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c) or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1023, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 12, § 19, effective January 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-418 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-421. Public transportation system license.

The state licensing authority shall issue a public transportation system license to every person operating a public transportation system that sells alcohol beverages by the drink to be served and consumed in or upon any dining, club, or parlor car; plane; bus; or other conveyance of the public transportation system. A public transportation system license issued to a commercial airline authorizes the licensee to sell alcohol beverages by the drink in an airport or airport concourse private club room that is in existence and operated by the licensee on or before April 1, 1995. A public transportation system license issued to a common carrier railroad authorizes the licensee to sell alcohol beverages by the drink at any event not open to the public that is held in a museum owned and operated by the licensee if the licensee notifies the appropriate local law enforcement agency of the event no later than fourteen days prior to the scheduled date of the event.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a public transportation system license to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44; except that a person licensed under this section may be interested in any other retail license issued pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1024, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-419 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-422. Vintner's restaurant license.

A vintner's restaurant license may be issued to a person operating a vintner's restaurant and also selling alcohol beverages for consumption on the premises.

A vintner's restaurant licensed pursuant to this section to manufacture vinous liquors upon its licensed premises may, upon approval of the state licensing authority, manufacture vinous liquors upon alternating proprietor licensed premises within the restrictions specified in section 44-3-103 (60).

Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, during the hours established in section 44-3-901 (6)(b), vinous liquors manufactured by a vintner's restaurant licensee on the licensed premises may be:

Furnished for consumption on the premises;

Sold to independent wholesalers for distribution to licensed retailers;

Sold to the public in sealed containers for off-premises consumption. Only vinous liquors fermented, manufactured, and packaged on the licensed premises or alternating proprietor licensed premises by the licensee shall be sold in sealed containers.

Sold at wholesale to licensed retailers in an amount up to fifty thousand gallons per calendar year.

A vintner's restaurant authorized to manufacture vinous liquors upon alternating proprietor licensed premises shall not conduct retail sales of vinous liquors from an area licensed or defined as an alternating proprietor licensed premises.

Every person selling alcohol beverages pursuant to this section shall purchase the alcohol beverages, other than those that are manufactured at the licensed vintner's restaurant, from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3; except that, during a calendar year, a person may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

The vintner's restaurant licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the alcohol beverages purchased, and the price paid for the alcohol beverages. The licensee shall retain the receipt and make it available to state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

A vintner's restaurant licensee may sell alcohol beverages for on-premises consumption only if at least fifteen percent of the gross on-premises food and drink income of the business of the licensed premises is from the sale of food.

Subject to subsection (5)(b) of this section, it is unlawful for an owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a vintner's restaurant license to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in another business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

A person interested directly or indirectly in a vintner's restaurant license may conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in a license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c) or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1025, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 13, § 20, effective January 31.

L. 2020:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 20-1055), ch. 15, p. 67, § 2, effective September 14.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-420 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-423. Removal of vinous liquor from licensed premises.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article 3 to the contrary, a licensee described in subsection (2) of this section may permit a customer of the licensee to reseal and remove from the licensed premises one opened container of partially consumed vinous liquor purchased on the premises so long as the originally sealed container did not contain more than seven hundred fifty milliliters of vinous liquor.

This section applies to a person:

That is duly licensed as a:

Manufacturer under section 44-3-402;

Limited winery under section 44-3-403;

Beer and wine licensee under section 44-3-411;

Hotel and restaurant under section 44-3-413;

Tavern under section 44-3-414;

Brew pub under section 44-3-417;

Vintner's restaurant under section 44-3-422;

Club under section 44-3-418;

Distillery pub under section 44-3-426; or

Lodging and entertainment facility under section 44-3-428; and

That has meals, as defined in section 44-3-103 (31), or sandwiches and light snacks available for consumption on the licensed premises.

Source:

L. 2018:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 18-173), ch. 102, p. 780, § 1, effective August 8; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1026, § 2, effective October 1.

44-3-424. Art gallery permit - definition.

A person operating an art gallery that offers complimentary alcohol beverages for consumption only on the premises may be issued an art gallery permit, which shall be renewed annually. An art gallery permittee shall not, directly or indirectly, sell alcohol beverages by the drink, shall not serve alcohol beverages for more than four hours in any one day, and shall not serve alcohol beverages more than fifteen days per year of licensure.

The state or local licensing authority may reject the application for an art gallery permit if the applicant fails to establish that the applicant is able to offer complimentary alcohol beverages without violating this section or creating a public safety risk to the neighborhood.

Upon initial application, and for each renewal, the applicant shall list each day that alcohol beverages will be served, which days shall not be changed without a minimum of fifteen days' written notice to the state and local licensing authority.

An art gallery shall not be denied an art gallery permit based solely on the art gallery's proximity to any public or private school or the principal campus of a college, university, or seminary.

An art gallery shall not charge an entrance fee or a cover charge in connection with offering complimentary alcohol beverages for consumption only on the premises.

An art gallery permit may be suspended or revoked in accordance with section 44-3-601 if the permittee violates any provision of this article 3 or any rule adopted pursuant to this article 3 or fails to truthfully furnish any required information in connection with a permit application.

It is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in an art gallery permit to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44; except that a person regulated under this section may have an interest in other art gallery permits; in a license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c); or in a financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

As used in this section, "art gallery" means an establishment whose primary purpose is to exhibit and offer for sale works of fine art as defined in section 6-15-101 or precious or semiprecious metals or stones as defined in section 18-16-102.

An art gallery issued a permit shall not intentionally allow more than two hundred fifty people to be on the premises at one time when alcohol beverages are being served.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to abrogate any insurance coverage required by law; to authorize a licensed art gallery to violate section 44-3-901, including, without limitation, serving a visibly intoxicated person and taking an alcohol beverage off the licensed premises; or to violate any zoning or occupancy ordinances or laws.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1027, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-422 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-425. Wine packaging permit - limitations - rules.

The state licensing authority may issue a wine packaging permit to a winery licensed under section 44-3-402, a limited winery licensed under section 44-3-403, or a wholesaler licensed under section 44-3-407 that allows the licensed winery, limited winery, or wholesaler to package tax-paid wine manufactured by another winery or manufacturer.

A licensed winery, limited winery, or wholesaler that obtains a wine packaging permit under this section shall:

Take possession and custody of the tax-paid wine that it packages; and

Return the packaged tax-paid wine either to the original manufacturer of the tax-paid wine or to the original manufacturer's licensed wholesaler; except that, if the original manufacturer's wholesaler obtains a wine packaging permit pursuant to this section, the wholesaler need not return the packaged tax-paid wine to the original manufacturer.

A licensed winery or limited winery that obtains a wine packaging permit pursuant to this section shall not sell or distribute tax-paid wine it packages:

To a person licensed to sell alcohol beverages at retail, for consumption on or off the licensed premises, under section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, 44-3-411, 44-3-412, 44-3-413, 44-3-414, 44-3-415, 44-3-416, 44-3-417, 44-3-418, 44-3-419, 44-3-420, 44-3-421, 44-3-422, 44-3-424, 44-3-426, or 44-3-428; or

Directly to a consumer.

The state licensing authority may adopt rules as necessary to implement and administer this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1028, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-423 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-426. Distillery pub license - legislative declaration - definition.

The general assembly finds and determines that:

Colorado is a state that welcomes and encourages entrepreneurs and new business opportunities;

Currently, manufacturing of spirituous liquors by persons licensed as manufacturers pursuant to section 44-3-402 is a thriving industry, with new distilleries opening throughout the state and increasing the availability of Colorado-produced craft spirits both within and outside the state;

The spirituous liquors manufacturing business focuses primarily on producing a spirituous liquor product that the licensed spirits manufacturer can then sell and distribute, through a wholesaler, throughout the state and in other states to retail outlets;

While licensed spirits manufacturers are permitted to sell their products directly to consumers, the majority of the manufacturing business is selling the bulk of a manufacturer's product to retail outlets that then sell the product to consumers;

On the other hand, the main focus of a distillery pub business authorized by this section is to operate a local pub in which food and alcohol beverages, including a small quantity of spirituous liquors fermented and distilled on site, are sold and served for on-premises consumption;

While a distillery pub is allowed to produce, serve, and distribute its own spirituous liquors, unlike a licensed spirits manufacturer, the production level for a distillery pub is capped, and the ability to distribute to retail outlets is greatly restricted, thereby establishing a new business model that is distinct from, and serves a different clientele than, a licensed spirits manufacturer;

Additionally, unlike a licensed spirits manufacturer, which is only required to obtain a license from the state licensing authority, a distillery pub must obtain both a state and local license after demonstrating that the distillery pub meets the reasonable requirements and the desires of the adult inhabitants of the neighborhood in which it will be situated; and

It is important to encourage the new distillery pub business model, which will add to the thriving craft spirits industry in this state without disrupting the ever-growing spirituous liquors manufacturing industry.

A distillery pub license may be issued to any person operating a distillery pub and also selling food and alcohol beverages for consumption on the premises. At least fifteen percent of the gross on-premises food and alcohol beverage income of the licensed distillery pub must be from the sale of food. For purposes of this subsection (2), "food" means a quantity of foodstuffs of a nature that is ordinarily consumed by an individual at regular intervals for the purpose of sustenance.

During the hours established in section 44-3-901 (6)(b), a licensed distillery pub may, with regard to spirituous liquors fermented and distilled by the distillery pub licensee on the licensed premises:

Furnish its spirituous liquors for consumption on the premises;

Sell its spirituous liquors to independent wholesalers for distribution to licensed retailers;

Sell its spirituous liquors to the public in sealed containers for off-premises consumption, as long as the spirituous liquors are fermented, distilled, and packaged on the licensed premises by the licensee; or

Sell its spirituous liquors at wholesale to licensed retailers in an amount up to two thousand seven hundred liters per spirituous liquor product per calendar year.

Except as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section, every person selling alcohol beverages pursuant to this section must purchase alcohol beverages, other than those that are fermented and distilled at the licensed distillery pub, from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3.

During a calendar year, a person selling alcohol beverages as provided in this section may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

The distillery pub licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the alcohol beverages purchased, and the price paid for the alcohol beverages. The licensee shall retain the receipt and make it available to state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

Except as provided in subsection (5)(b) of this section, it is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a distillery pub license to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

A person interested directly or indirectly in a distillery pub license may conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in:

Other distillery pub licenses;

A license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c); or

A financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1028, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 13, § 21, effective January 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-424 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-427. Liquor-licensed drugstore manager's permit.

The state licensing authority may issue a manager's permit to an individual who is employed by a liquor-licensed drugstore licensed under section 44-3-410 and who will be in actual control of the liquor-licensed drugstore's alcohol beverage operations.

An individual seeking a manager's permit shall apply to the state licensing authority in the form and manner required by the state licensing authority. To obtain a manager's permit, the individual must demonstrate that he or she:

Has not been convicted of a crime involving the sale or distribution of alcohol beverages within the eight years immediately preceding the date on which the application is submitted;

Has not been convicted of any felony within the five years immediately preceding the date on which the application is submitted; except that in considering the conviction of a felony, the state licensing authority is governed by section 24-5-101;

Is at least twenty-one years of age; and

Has not had a manager's permit or any similar permit issued by the state, a local jurisdiction, or another state or foreign jurisdiction revoked by the issuing authority within the three years immediately preceding the date on which the application is submitted.

It is unlawful for an individual who has a manager's permit issued under this section to be interested directly or indirectly in:

A wholesaler licensed pursuant to section 44-3-407;

A limited winery licensed pursuant to section 44-3-403;

An importer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-405;

A manufacturer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-402 or 44-3-406; or

Any business licensed under this article 3 that has had its license revoked by the state licensing authority within the eight years immediately preceding the date on which the individual applies for a manager's permit under this section.

In recognition of the state's flourishing local breweries, wineries, and distilleries that locally produce high-quality malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors, managers of liquor-licensed drugstores are encouraged to purchase and promote locally produced alcohol beverage products in their liquor-licensed drugstores.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1030, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-425 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-428. Lodging and entertainment license.

A lodging and entertainment license may be issued to a lodging and entertainment facility selling alcohol beverages by the drink only to customers for consumption on the premises. A lodging and entertainment facility licensee shall have sandwiches and light snacks available for consumption on the premises during business hours but need not have meals available for consumption.

A lodging and entertainment facility licensed to sell alcohol beverages as provided in this section shall purchase alcohol beverages only from a wholesaler licensed pursuant to this article 3; except that, during a calendar year, a lodging and entertainment facility licensed to sell alcohol beverages as provided in this section may purchase not more than two thousand dollars' worth of malt, vinous, and spirituous liquors from retailers licensed pursuant to sections 44-3-409, 44-3-410, and 44-4-104 (1)(c).

A lodging and entertainment facility licensee shall retain evidence of each purchase of malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors from a retailer licensed pursuant to section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, or 44-4-104 (1)(c), in the form of a purchase receipt showing the name of the licensed retailer, the date of purchase, a description of the alcohol beverages purchased, and the price paid for the alcohol beverages. The lodging and entertainment facility licensee shall retain the receipt and make it available to the state and local licensing authorities at all times during business hours.

Except as provided in subsection (3)(b) of this section, it is unlawful for any owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in lodging and entertainment licenses to conduct, own either in whole or in part, or be directly or indirectly interested in any other business licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

An owner, part owner, shareholder, or person interested directly or indirectly in a lodging and entertainment license may have an interest in:

A license described in section 44-3-401 (1)(j) to (1)(t), (1)(v), or (1)(w), 44-3-412 (1), or 44-4-104 (1)(c); or

A financial institution referred to in section 44-3-308 (4).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

The manager for each lodging and entertainment license, the lodging and entertainment facility licensee, or an employee or agent of the lodging and entertainment facility licensee shall purchase alcohol beverages for one licensed premises only, and the purchases shall be separate and distinct from purchases for any other lodging and entertainment license.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

At the time a tavern license issued under section 44-3-414 is due for renewal or by one year after August 10, 2016, whichever occurs later, a person licensed as a tavern that does not have as its principal business the sale of alcohol beverages, has a valid license on August 10, 2016, and is a lodging and entertainment facility may apply to, and the applicable local licensing authority shall, convert the tavern license to a lodging and entertainment license under this section, and the person may continue to operate as a lodging and entertainment facility licensee. A person applying to convert an existing tavern license to a lodging and entertainment license under this subsection (5) may apply to convert the license, even if the location of the licensed premises is within five hundred feet of any public or parochial school or the principal campus of any college, university, or seminary, so long as the local licensing authority has previously approved the location of the licensed premises in accordance with section 44-3-313 (1)(d).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1031, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 14, § 22, effective January 31.

L. 2022:

(4) amended, (HB 22-1415), ch. 426, p. 3019, § 4, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-426 as it existed prior to 2018.